Alabama, session 2026rs, SB24.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) No later than March 1, 2027, the Board
of Pardons and Paroles shall develop and make available on the
agency's website, in an easily accessible manner, an
explanation of how an individual who has lost his or her right
to vote by reason of conviction of a crime may have their
right to vote restored under Section 15-22-36.1 if the
individual meets the criteria set forth in that section. The
website shall include a form, along with instructions, which
an individual may electronically submit, which shall serve as
an application for a Certificate of Eligibility to Register to
Vote. The form shall automatically be submitted to the Board
of Pardons and Paroles.
(b) Upon receipt of an application under subsection
(a), the board shall forthwith review the application and make
a determination of eligibility in accordance with Section
15-22-36.1 and, if appropriate, issue to the applicant a
Page 1

15-22-36.1 and, if appropriate, issue to the applicant a
SB24 Enrolled
Certificate of Eligibility to Register to Vote in accordance
with Section 15-22-36.1(e).
(c) The Board of Pardons and Paroles shall publish on
the board's website the Alabama Institutional Serial (AIS)
number of each individual who is a parolee or probationer
under the jurisdiction of the board whose right to vote has
been restored pursuant to Section 15-22-36.1 and if an
applicant under subsection (a) included his or her residence
on the application form, the county in which the individual
resides.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB24 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB24
Senate 19-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Amended and passed: 08-Apr-26




Senate concurred in House amendment 08-Apr-26




By: Senator Coleman-Madison
Page 3